Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.245

Prior court order validity.

(1) This chapter does not affect the validity of any court order issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to the repeal of chapter 26.10 RCW. Orders issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to the repeal of chapter 26.10 RCW, remain in effect and do not need to be reissued in a new order under this chapter.

(2) All orders issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019 remain operative after the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019. After the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019, if an order issued under chapter 26.10 RCW is modified, the modification is subject to the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2021 c 65 s 105; 2020 c 312 s 111; 2019 c 437 s 213.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.